Illinois, session 104th, HB4401.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by adding 5Section 24-9.6 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24-9.6 new)7    Sec. 24-9.6. Firearm access by prohibited persons.8    (a) In this Section, "prohibited person" has the meaning 9ascribed to the term in Section 10 of the Safe Gun Storage Act. 10    (b) A person commits criminal firearm negligence when:11        (1) the person owns, possesses, or controls a firearm;12        (2) the person knows or reasonably should know that a 13    prohibited person resides in or regularly accesses the 14    premises;15        (3) the person fails to securely store the firearm as 16    required by law; and17        (4) the prohibited person gains access to the firearm.18    (c) Sentence.19        (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (2) and 20    (3) of this subsection, a violation of subsection (b) is a 21    Class A misdemeanor.22        (2) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class 4 felony 23    if the firearm is used in the commission of a criminal   HB4401- 2 -LRB104 17697 RLC 31128 b1    offense.2        (3) A violation of subsection (b) is a Class 3 felony 3    if the use of the firearm results in death or great bodily 4    harm to another person.5    (d) This Section does not apply to:6        (1) firearms secured in compliance with applicable 7    safe storage laws; or8        (2) circumstances in which the firearm was accessed 9    through unlawful entry or theft.10    (e) This Section shall be construed in conjunction with 11existing civil penalties under Section 24-9.5 and does not 12preclude the imposition of civil fines if applicable.